Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.150

Brand book—Contents—Costs.

The director shall publish a book to be known as the "Washington State Brand Book", showing all the brands of record. The book shall contain the name and address of the owners of brands of record and a copy of the livestock identification laws and rules. Supplements to the brand book showing newly recorded brands, amendments, or newly adopted rules shall be published at the discretion of the director. Whenever the director deems it necessary, the director may publish a new brand book. The director may collect moneys to recover the reasonable costs of publishing and distributing copies of the brand book.

[ 2003 c 326 s 16; 1974 ex.s. c 64 s 5; 1959 c 54 s 15.]